test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - hlgihl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_IHL_STEM_2

     hlgihl+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgílga
     hlgihl+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgílgang
     hlgihl+V+DIRECT+PAST: hlgílgan
     hlgihl+V+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílang
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang
     hlgihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílganggang
     hlgihl+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgangang
     hlgihl+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgiinii
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgaangaa
     hlgihl+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgílgaangaan
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asa'áa
     hlgihl+V+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asa'áang
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaasdláa
     hlgihl+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaasdláang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'waa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'waang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'waa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'anggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'angang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaa'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaa'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgílang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'ang'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgílgang'ang'waang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgílgang'ang'waa.ang
